Connecticut, session 2026, SB00232.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Cable operator" has the same meaning as provided in 47 USC 522,
as amended from time to time;
(2) "Commercial advertisement" has the same meaning as such term
is used in the Commercial Advertisement Loudness Mitigation Act, P.L.
111-311, as amended from time to time;
(3) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Consumer
Protection;
(4) "Consumer" means any person who is physically present in this
state and is a recipient, or a prospective recipient, of a streaming video
service;
sSB232 / File No. 217 1

sSB232 File No. 217
(5) "Department" means the Department of Consumer Protection;
(6) "Multichannel video programming distributor" has the same
meaning as provided in 47 USC 522, as amended from time to time;
(7) "Person" means any individual, association, corporation, limited
liability company, partnership, trust or other legal entity;
(8) "Streaming video service" means any service through which any
video content, including, but not limited to, any video programming, is
made available directly to consumers through a distribution method
that uses the Internet protocol;
(9) "Streaming video service provider" or "provider" (A) means any
person who makes a streaming video service available directly to
consumers, and (B) does not include (i) any television broadcast station,
(ii) any multichannel video programming distributor, including, but not
limited to, any cable operator, or (iii) any person who makes available
any video content, including, but not limited to, any video
programming, without commercial advertisements;
(10) "Television broadcast station" has the same meaning as provided
in 47 USC 325, as amended from time to time; and
(11) "Video programming" has the same meaning as provided in 47
USC 613, as amended from time to time.
(b) On and after July 1, 2027, and except as provided in subsection (c)
of this section, no streaming video service provider shall transmit the
audio of any commercial advertisement by way of a streaming video
service at a volume that is louder than the volume established in the
regulations adopted by the Federal Communications Commission for
television broadcast stations or multichannel video programming
distributors, including, but not limited to, cable operators, pursuant to
the Commercial Advertisement Loudness Mitigation Act, P.L. 111-311,
as said act and such regulations may be amended from time to time.
(c) (1) If a streaming video service provider believes that compliance
sSB232 / File No. 217 2

sSB232 File No. 217
with the provisions of subsection (b) of this section would pose a
significant financial hardship to the provider, the provider may submit
a waiver application to the Department of Consumer Protection in a
form and manner prescribed by the Commissioner of Consumer
Protection. The waiver application shall include:
(A) The name and business address of the provider;
(B) A description of the nature and extent of the alleged significant
financial hardship and any supporting information or documents; and
(C) Any other information or documents the commissioner may
reasonably require for the purposes of this subdivision.
(2) Not later than thirty days after the department receives a
completed waiver application submitted under subdivision (1) of this
subsection, the commissioner shall (A) review such application, (B) on
the basis of such review and in the commissioner's sole discretion, issue
a decision approving or disapproving such application and issuing or
not issuing a waiver, and (C) send notice to the streaming video service
provider, in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner,
disclosing the commissioner's decision and the basis for such decision.
(3) Each waiver issued pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection
(A) shall be valid for a period of one year beginning on the date on
which the commissioner sends notice to the streaming video service
provider disclosing the commissioner's decision to approve such
provider's application and issue such waiver, and (B) may be renewed
for an additional one-year period (i) upon submission of a waiver
renewal application made during the initial waiver period and in the
manner set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection for an initial waiver
application, and (ii) subject to review and approval by the commissioner
in the manner set forth in subdivision (2) of this subsection for review
and approval of an initial waiver application.
(d) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection may adopt
regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 of the
sSB232 / File No. 217 3

sSB232 File No. 217
general statutes, to implement the provisions of subsections (b) and (c)
of this section.
(e) Any violation of the provisions of subsection (b) of this section
shall constitute an unfair trade practice for the purposes of subsection
(a) of section 42-110b of the general statutes. The provisions of section
42-110g of the general statutes shall not apply to any such violation.
Nothing in this section shall be construed as providing the basis for a
private right of action for any violation of subsection (b) of this section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (b), "Beginning on" was changed to "On and after" for
consistency with standard drafting conventions.
GL Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB232 / File No. 217 4

sSB232 File No. 217
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Consumer Protection, Dept. GF - Cost 137,943 178,191
State Comptroller - Fringe GF - Cost 55,513 74,018
Benefits1
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill prohibits streaming services from transmitting audio for
commercial advertising above a certain volume and makes violations an
unfair trade practice resulting in a total cost to the state of $193,456 in
FY 27 and $252,209 in FY 28.
To meet the requirements of the bill the Department of Consumer
Protection (DCP) will need to hire a state program manager and an
accounts examiner for a salary and other expenses cost of $137,943 in FY
272 and $178,191 in FY 28, along with associated fringe benefits costs of
$55,513 in FY 27 and $74,018 in FY 28. These employees are needed to
draft regulations, create the waiver program and application, review
financial hardship waivers, investigate complaints, and enforce the
provisions of the bill.
The Out Years
1The fringe benefit costs for most state employees are budgeted centrally in accounts
administered by the Comptroller. The estimated active employee fringe benefit cost
associated with most personnel changes is 41.82% of payroll in FY 27.
2FY 27 costs reflect nine months of expenditures due to the bill's 10/1/26 effective date.
sSB232 / File No. 217 5

sSB232 File No. 217
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to employee wage increases and
inflation.
sSB232 / File No. 217 6

sSB232 File No. 217
OLR Bill Analysis
sSB 232
AN ACT CONCERNING STREAMING VIDEO SERVICES AND THE
VOLUME OF COMMERCIAL ADVERTISEMENTS.